Louisiana, session 2026, HB451.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:98, 295, and 919(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§98. Notice of hearing by commissioner
Whenever the commissioner is to hold a hearing pursuant to the provisions
of this Part, he shall issue a written summons or notice thereof to the applicant or
permittee, directing him to show cause why his application should not be refused or
why his permit should not be suspended or revoked. The notice or summons shall
state the time, place, and hour of the hearing, which shall be not less than ten nor
more than thirty calendar days from the date of the notice. The notice or summons
shall enumerate the cause or causes alleged for refusing the application or for
suspending or revoking the permit. When a petition has been filed opposing the
issuance of the permit or asking for its suspension or revocation, a copy of the
petition shall accompany the notice or summons. All notices or summonses shall be
either delivered to the applicant or permittee in person, transmitted by electronic
means to the address designated by the permittee, or sent by certified mail to the
applicant or permittee and directed to him at the mailing address as given in his last
application for the permit. When so addressed and mailed, notices or summonses
shall be conclusively presumed to have been received by the applicant or permittee.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 451 ENROLLED
Service by electronic means is complete upon transmission unless it is known
transmission did not reach the address provided by the permittee.
* * *
§295. Notice of hearing by commissioner
Whenever the commissioner is to hold a hearing pursuant to the provisions
of this Part, he shall issue a written summons or notice thereof to the applicant or
permittee, directing him to show cause why his application should not be refused or
why his permit should not be suspended or revoked. The notice or summons shall
state the time, place, and hour of the hearing, which shall be not less than ten nor
more than thirty calendar days from the date of the notice. The notice or summons
shall enumerate the cause or causes alleged for refusing the application or for
suspending or revoking the permit. When a petition has been filed opposing the
issuance of the permit or asking for its suspension or revocation, a copy of the
petition shall accompany the notice or summons. All notices or summonses shall be
either delivered to the applicant or the permittee in person, transmitted by electronic
means to the address designated by the permittee, or permittee in person or sent by
certified mail to the applicant or permittee and directed to him at the mailing address
as given in his last application for the permit. When so addressed and mailed,
notices or summonses shall be conclusively presumed to have been received by the
applicant or permittee. Service by electronic means is complete upon transmission
unless it is known transmission did not reach the address provided by the permittee.
* * *
§919. Administrative hearings
A. When the commissioner holds a hearing pursuant to this Chapter, he shall
issue a written summons or notice to the applicant or permittee directing him to show
cause why his application should not be refused, or why he should not be assessed
a penalty, or why his permit should not be suspended or revoked. The notice or
summons shall state the time, place, and hour of the hearing, which shall be not less
than ten nor more than thirty calendar days from the day of the notice. The notice
or summons shall enumerate the cause or causes alleged for refusing the application
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 451 ENROLLED
or for assessing the penalty or suspending or revoking the permit. If a petition has
been filed opposing the issuance of the permit or asking for its suspension or
revocation, a copy of the petition shall accompany the notice or summons. All
notices or summonses shall be either delivered to the applicant or permittee in
person, transmitted by electronic means to the address designated by the permittee,
or sent by certified mail to the applicant or permittee and directed to him at the
mailing address as given in his last application for the permit. When so addressed
and mailed, notices or summonses shall be presumed to have been received by the
applicant or permittee. Service by electronic means is complete upon transmission
unless it is known transmission did not reach the address provided by the permittee.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.